Utah statutes.
61-2-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Department" means the Department of Commerce.

(2)  "Director" means the director of the division appointed under Section 61-2-201.

(3)  "Division" means the Division of Real Estate created in Section 61-2-201.

(4)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the department appointed under Section 13-1-3.



Enacted by Chapter 379, 2010 General Session

